Illinois, session 104th, HB4916.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Act on the Aging is amended by 5changing Section 4.02 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 105/4.02)7    Sec. 4.02. Community Care Program. The Department shall 8establish a program of services to prevent unnecessary 9institutionalization of persons age 60 and older in need of 10long term care or who are established as persons who suffer 11from Alzheimer's disease or a related disorder under the 12Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act, thereby enabling them to 13remain in their own homes or in other living arrangements. 14Such preventive services, which may be coordinated with other 15programs for the aged, may include, but are not limited to, any 16or all of the following:17        (a) (blank);18        (b) (blank);19        (c) home care aide services;20        (d) personal assistant services;21        (e) adult day services;22        (f) home-delivered meals;23        (g) education in self-care;  HB4916- 2 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1        (h) personal care services;2        (i) adult day health services;3        (j) habilitation services;4        (k) respite care;5        (k-5) community reintegration services; 6        (k-6) flexible senior services;7        (k-7) medication management;8        (k-8) emergency home response; 9        (l) other nonmedical social services that may enable 10    the person to become self-supporting; or11        (m) (blank).12    The Department shall establish eligibility standards for 13such services. In determining the amount and nature of 14services for which a person may qualify, consideration shall 15not be given to the value of cash, property, or other assets 16held in the name of the person's spouse pursuant to a written 17agreement dividing marital property into equal but separate 18shares or pursuant to a transfer of the person's interest in a 19home to his spouse, provided that the spouse's share of the 20marital property is not made available to the person seeking 21such services.22    The Department shall require as a condition of eligibility 23that all new financially eligible applicants apply for and 24enroll in medical assistance under Article V of the Illinois 25Public Aid Code in accordance with rules promulgated by the 26Department.   HB4916- 3 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1    The Department shall, in conjunction with the Department 2of Public Aid (now Department of Healthcare and Family 3Services), seek appropriate amendments under Sections 1915 and 41924 of the Social Security Act. The purpose of the amendments 5shall be to extend eligibility for home and community based 6services under Sections 1915 and 1924 of the Social Security 7Act to persons who transfer to or for the benefit of a spouse 8those amounts of income and resources allowed under Section 91924 of the Social Security Act. Subject to the approval of 10such amendments, the Department shall extend the provisions of 11Section 5-4 of the Illinois Public Aid Code to persons who, but 12for the provision of home or community-based services, would 13require the level of care provided in an institution, as is 14provided for in federal law. Those persons no longer found to 15be eligible for receiving noninstitutional services due to 16changes in the eligibility criteria shall be given 45 days 17notice prior to actual termination. Those persons receiving 18notice of termination may contact the Department and request 19the determination be appealed at any time during the 45 day 20notice period. The target population identified for the 21purposes of this Section are persons age 60 and older with an 22identified service need. Priority shall be given to those who 23are at imminent risk of institutionalization. The services 24shall be provided to eligible persons age 60 and older to the 25extent that the cost of the services together with the other 26personal maintenance expenses of the persons are reasonably   HB4916- 4 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1related to the standards established for care in a group 2facility appropriate to the person's condition. These 3noninstitutional services, pilot projects, or experimental 4facilities may be provided as part of or in addition to those 5authorized by federal law or those funded and administered by 6the Department of Human Services. The Departments of Human 7Services, Healthcare and Family Services, Public Health, 8Veterans' Affairs, and Commerce and Economic Opportunity and 9other appropriate agencies of State, federal, and local 10governments shall cooperate with the Department on Aging in 11the establishment and development of the noninstitutional 12services. The Department shall require an annual audit from 13all personal assistant and home care aide vendors contracting 14with the Department under this Section. The annual audit shall 15assure that each audited vendor's procedures are in compliance 16with Department's financial reporting guidelines requiring an 17administrative and employee wage and benefits cost split as 18defined in administrative rules. The audit is a public record 19under the Freedom of Information Act. The Department shall 20execute, relative to the nursing home prescreening project, 21written inter-agency agreements with the Department of Human 22Services and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 23to effect the following: (1) intake procedures and common 24eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 25noninstitutional services; and (2) the establishment and 26development of noninstitutional services in areas of the State   HB4916- 5 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1where they are not currently available or are undeveloped. On 2and after July 1, 1996, all nursing home prescreenings for 3individuals 60 years of age or older shall be conducted by the 4Department.5    As part of the Department on Aging's routine training of 6case managers and case manager supervisors, the Department may 7include information on family futures planning for persons who 8are age 60 or older and who are caregivers of their adult 9children with developmental disabilities. The content of the 10training shall be at the Department's discretion.11    The Department is authorized to establish a system of 12recipient copayment for services provided under this Section, 13such copayment to be based upon the recipient's ability to pay 14but in no case to exceed the actual cost of the services 15provided. Additionally, any portion of a person's income which 16is equal to or less than the federal poverty standard shall not 17be considered by the Department in determining the copayment. 18The level of such copayment shall be adjusted whenever 19necessary to reflect any change in the officially designated 20federal poverty standard.21    The Department, or the Department's authorized 22representative, may recover the amount of moneys expended for 23services provided to or in behalf of a person under this 24Section by a claim against the person's estate or against the 25estate of the person's surviving spouse, but no recovery may 26be had until after the death of the surviving spouse, if any,   HB4916- 6 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1and then only at such time when there is no surviving child who 2is under age 21 or blind or who has a permanent and total 3disability. This paragraph, however, shall not bar recovery, 4at the death of the person, of moneys for services provided to 5the person or in behalf of the person under this Section to 6which the person was not entitled; provided that such recovery 7shall not be enforced against any real estate while it is 8occupied as a homestead by the surviving spouse or other 9dependent, if no claims by other creditors have been filed 10against the estate, or, if such claims have been filed, they 11remain dormant for failure of prosecution or failure of the 12claimant to compel administration of the estate for the 13purpose of payment. This paragraph shall not bar recovery from 14the estate of a spouse, under Sections 1915 and 1924 of the 15Social Security Act and Section 5-4 of the Illinois Public Aid 16Code, who precedes a person receiving services under this 17Section in death. All moneys for services paid to or in behalf 18of the person under this Section shall be claimed for recovery 19from the deceased spouse's estate. "Homestead", as used in 20this paragraph, means the dwelling house and contiguous real 21estate occupied by a surviving spouse or relative, as defined 22by the rules and regulations of the Department of Healthcare 23and Family Services, regardless of the value of the property.24    The Department shall increase the effectiveness of the 25existing Community Care Program by:26        (1) ensuring that in-home services included in the   HB4916- 7 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1    care plan are available on evenings and weekends;2        (2) ensuring that care plans contain the services that 3    eligible participants need based on the number of days in 4    a month, not limited to specific blocks of time, as 5    identified by the comprehensive assessment tool selected 6    by the Department for use statewide, not to exceed the 7    total monthly service cost maximum allowed for each 8    service; the Department shall develop administrative rules 9    to implement this item (2);10        (3) ensuring that the participants have the right to 11    choose the services contained in their care plan and to 12    direct how those services are provided, based on 13    administrative rules established by the Department;14        (4)(blank);15        (5) ensuring that homemakers can provide personal care 16    services that may or may not involve contact with clients, 17    including, but not limited to:18            (A) bathing;19            (B) grooming;20            (C) toileting;21            (D) nail care;22            (E) transferring;23            (F) respiratory services;24            (G) exercise; or25            (H) positioning;26        (6) ensuring that homemaker program vendors are not   HB4916- 8 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1    restricted from hiring homemakers who are family members 2    of clients or recommended by clients; the Department may 3    not, by rule or policy, require homemakers who are family 4    members of clients or recommended by clients to accept 5    assignments in homes other than the client;6        (7) ensuring that the State may access maximum federal 7    matching funds by seeking approval for the Centers for 8    Medicare and Medicaid Services for modifications to the 9    State's home and community based services waiver and 10    additional waiver opportunities, including applying for 11    enrollment in the Balance Incentive Payment Program by May 12    1, 2013, in order to maximize federal matching funds; this 13    shall include, but not be limited to, modification that 14    reflects all changes in the Community Care Program 15    services and all increases in the services cost maximum;16        (8) ensuring that the determination of need tool 17    accurately reflects the service needs of individuals with 18    Alzheimer's disease and related dementia disorders; 19        (9) ensuring that services are authorized accurately 20    and consistently for the Community Care Program (CCP); the 21    Department shall implement a Service Authorization policy 22    directive; the purpose shall be to ensure that eligibility 23    and services are authorized accurately and consistently in 24    the CCP program; the policy directive shall clarify 25    service authorization guidelines to Care Coordination 26    Units and Community Care Program providers no later than   HB4916- 9 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1    May 1, 2013;2        (10) working in conjunction with Care Coordination 3    Units, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 4    the Department of Human Services, Community Care Program 5    providers, and other stakeholders to make improvements to 6    the Medicaid claiming processes and the Medicaid 7    enrollment procedures or requirements as needed, 8    including, but not limited to, specific policy changes or 9    rules to improve the up-front enrollment of participants 10    in the Medicaid program and specific policy changes or 11    rules to insure more prompt submission of bills to the 12    federal government to secure maximum federal matching 13    dollars as promptly as possible; the Department on Aging 14    shall have at least 3 meetings with stakeholders by 15    January 1, 2014 in order to address these improvements;16        (11) requiring home care service providers to comply 17    with the rounding of hours worked provisions under the 18    federal Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) and as set forth 19    in 29 CFR 785.48(b) by May 1, 2013;20        (12) implementing any necessary policy changes or 21    promulgating any rules, no later than January 1, 2014, to 22    assist the Department of Healthcare and Family Services in 23    moving as many participants as possible, consistent with 24    federal regulations, into coordinated care plans if a care 25    coordination plan that covers long term care is available 26    in the recipient's area; and   HB4916- 10 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1        (13) (blank).2    By January 1, 2009 or as soon after the end of the Cash and 3Counseling Demonstration Project as is practicable, the 4Department may, based on its evaluation of the demonstration 5project, promulgate rules concerning personal assistant 6services, to include, but need not be limited to, 7qualifications, employment screening, rights under fair labor 8standards, training, fiduciary agent, and supervision 9requirements. All applicants shall be subject to the 10provisions of the Health Care Worker Background Check Act. 11    The Department shall develop procedures to enhance 12availability of services on evenings, weekends, and on an 13emergency basis to meet the respite needs of caregivers. 14Procedures shall be developed to permit the utilization of 15services in successive blocks of 24 hours up to the monthly 16maximum established by the Department. Workers providing these 17services shall be appropriately trained.18    No person may perform chore/housekeeping and home care 19aide services under a program authorized by this Section 20unless that person has been issued a certificate of 21pre-service to do so by his or her employing agency. 22Information gathered to effect such certification shall 23include (i) the person's name, (ii) the date the person was 24hired by his or her current employer, and (iii) the training, 25including dates and levels. Persons engaged in the program 26authorized by this Section before the effective date of this   HB4916- 11 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1amendatory Act of 1991 shall be issued a certificate of all 2pre-service and in-service training from his or her employer 3upon submitting the necessary information. The employing 4agency shall be required to retain records of all staff 5pre-service and in-service training, and shall provide such 6records to the Department upon request and upon termination of 7the employer's contract with the Department. In addition, the 8employing agency is responsible for the issuance of 9certifications of in-service training completed to their 10employees.11    The Department is required to develop a system to ensure 12that persons working as home care aides and personal 13assistants receive increases in their wages when the federal 14minimum wage is increased by requiring vendors to certify that 15they are meeting the federal minimum wage statute for home 16care aides and personal assistants. An employer that cannot 17ensure that the minimum wage increase is being given to home 18care aides and personal assistants shall be denied any 19increase in reimbursement costs.20    The Community Care Program Advisory Committee is created 21in the Department on Aging. The Director shall appoint 22individuals to serve in the Committee, who shall serve at 23their own expense. Members of the Committee must abide by all 24applicable ethics laws. The Committee shall advise the 25Department on issues related to the Department's program of 26services to prevent unnecessary institutionalization. The   HB4916- 12 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1Committee shall meet on a bi-monthly basis and shall serve to 2identify and advise the Department on present and potential 3issues affecting the service delivery network, the program's 4clients, and the Department and to recommend solution 5strategies. Persons appointed to the Committee shall be 6appointed on, but not limited to, their own and their agency's 7experience with the program, geographic representation, and 8willingness to serve. The Director shall appoint members to 9the Committee to represent provider, advocacy, policy 10research, and other constituencies committed to the delivery 11of high quality home and community-based services to older 12adults. Representatives shall be appointed to ensure 13representation from community care providers, including, but 14not limited to, adult day service providers, homemaker 15providers, case coordination and case management units, 16emergency home response providers, statewide trade or labor 17unions that represent home care aides and direct care staff, 18area agencies on aging, adults over age 60, membership 19organizations representing older adults, and other 20organizational entities, providers of care, or individuals 21with demonstrated interest and expertise in the field of home 22and community care as determined by the Director.23    Nominations may be presented from any agency or State 24association with interest in the program. The Director, or his 25or her designee, shall serve as the permanent co-chair of the 26advisory committee. One other co-chair shall be nominated and   HB4916- 13 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1approved by the members of the committee on an annual basis. 2Committee members' terms of appointment shall be for 4 years 3with one-quarter of the appointees' terms expiring each year. 4A member shall continue to serve until his or her replacement 5is named. The Department shall fill vacancies that have a 6remaining term of over one year, and this replacement shall 7occur through the annual replacement of expiring terms. The 8Director shall designate Department staff to provide technical 9assistance and staff support to the committee. Department 10representation shall not constitute membership of the 11committee. All Committee papers, issues, recommendations, 12reports, and meeting memoranda are advisory only. The 13Director, or his or her designee, shall make a written report, 14as requested by the Committee, regarding issues before the 15Committee. 16    The Department on Aging and the Department of Human 17Services shall cooperate in the development and submission of 18an annual report on programs and services provided under this 19Section. Such joint report shall be filed with the Governor 20and the General Assembly on or before March 31 of the following 21fiscal year.22    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 23shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 24by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act and 25filing such additional copies with the State Government Report 26Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is required   HB4916- 14 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library Act.2    Those persons previously found eligible for receiving 3noninstitutional services whose services were discontinued 4under the Emergency Budget Act of Fiscal Year 1992, and who do 5not meet the eligibility standards in effect on or after July 61, 1992, shall remain ineligible on and after July 1, 1992. 7Those persons previously not required to cost-share and who 8were required to cost-share effective March 1, 1992, shall 9continue to meet cost-share requirements on and after July 1, 101992. Beginning July 1, 1992, all clients will be required to 11meet eligibility, cost-share, and other requirements and will 12have services discontinued or altered when they fail to meet 13these requirements.14    For the purposes of this Section, "flexible senior 15services" refers to services that require one-time or periodic 16expenditures, including, but not limited to, respite care, 17home modification, assistive technology, housing assistance, 18and transportation. 19    The Department shall implement an electronic service 20verification based on global positioning systems or other 21cost-effective technology for the Community Care Program no 22later than January 1, 2014. 23    The Department shall require, as a condition of 24eligibility, application for the medical assistance program 25under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 26    The Department may authorize Community Care Program   HB4916- 15 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1services until an applicant is determined eligible for medical 2assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 3    The Department shall continue to provide Community Care 4Program reports as required by statute, which shall include an 5annual report on Care Coordination Unit performance and 6adherence to service guidelines and a 6-month supplemental 7report. 8    In regard to community care providers, failure to comply 9with Department on Aging policies shall be cause for 10disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, 11disqualification from serving Community Care Program clients. 12Each provider, upon submission of any bill or invoice to the 13Department for payment for services rendered, shall include a 14notarized statement, under penalty of perjury pursuant to 15Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that the 16provider has complied with all Department policies. 17    The Director of the Department on Aging shall make 18information available to the State Board of Elections as may 19be required by an agreement the State Board of Elections has 20entered into with a multi-state voter registration list 21maintenance system. 22    The Department shall pay an enhanced rate of at least 23$1.77 per unit under the Community Care Program to those 24in-home service provider agencies that offer health insurance 25coverage as a benefit to their direct service worker employees 26pursuant to rules adopted by the Department. The Department   HB4916- 16 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1shall review the enhanced rate as part of its process to rebase 2in-home service provider reimbursement rates pursuant to 3federal waiver requirements. Subject to federal approval, 4beginning on January 1, 2024, rates for adult day services 5shall be increased to $16.84 per hour and rates for each way 6transportation services for adult day services shall be 7increased to $12.44 per unit transportation. 8    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2024, 9rates for homemaker services shall be increased to $28.07 to 10sustain a minimum wage of $17 per hour for direct service 11workers. Rates in subsequent State fiscal years shall be no 12lower than the rates put into effect upon federal approval. 13Providers of in-home services shall be required to certify to 14the Department that they remain in compliance with the 15mandated wage increase for direct service workers. Fringe 16benefits, including, but not limited to, paid time off and 17payment for training, health insurance, travel, or 18transportation, shall not be reduced in relation to the rate 19increases described in this paragraph. 20    Subject to and upon federal approval, on and after January 211, 2025, rates for homemaker services shall be increased to 22$29.63 to sustain a minimum wage of $18 per hour for direct 23service workers. Rates in subsequent State fiscal years shall 24be no lower than the rates put into effect upon federal 25approval. Providers of in-home services shall be required to 26certify to the Department that they remain in compliance with   HB4916- 17 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1the mandated wage increase for direct service workers. Fringe 2benefits, including, but not limited to, paid time off and 3payment for training, health insurance, travel, or 4transportation, shall not be reduced in relation to the rate 5increases described in this paragraph. 6    Subject to and upon federal approval, on and after January 71, 2026, rates for homemaker services shall be increased to 8$30.80 to sustain a minimum wage of $18.75 per hour for direct 9service workers. Rates in subsequent State fiscal years shall 10be no lower than the rates put into effect upon federal 11approval. Providers of in-home services shall be required to 12certify to the Department that they remain in compliance with 13the mandated wage increase for direct service workers. Fringe 14benefits, including, but not limited to, paid time off and 15payment for training, health insurance, travel, or 16transportation, shall not be reduced in relation to the rate 17increases described in this paragraph. 18    Within 30 days after the effective date of this amendatory 19Act of the 104th General Assembly, rates for adult day 20services shall be increased to $17.84 per hour and rates for 21each way transportation services for adult day services shall 22be increased to $13.44 per unit transportation. 23    The General Assembly finds it necessary to authorize an 24aggressive Medicaid enrollment initiative designed to maximize 25federal Medicaid funding for the Community Care Program which 26produces significant savings for the State of Illinois. The   HB4916- 18 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1Department on Aging shall establish and implement a Community 2Care Program Medicaid Initiative. Under the Initiative, the 3Department on Aging shall, at a minimum: (i) provide an 4enhanced rate to adequately compensate care coordination units 5to enroll eligible Community Care Program clients into 6Medicaid; (ii) use recommendations from a stakeholder 7committee on how best to implement the Initiative; and (iii) 8establish requirements for State agencies to make enrollment 9in the State's Medical Assistance program easier for seniors. 10    The Community Care Program Medicaid Enrollment Oversight 11Subcommittee is created as a subcommittee of the Older Adult 12Services Advisory Committee established in Section 35 of the 13Older Adult Services Act to make recommendations on how best 14to increase the number of medical assistance recipients who 15are enrolled in the Community Care Program. The Subcommittee 16shall consist of all of the following persons who must be 17appointed within 30 days after June 4, 2018 (the effective 18date of Public Act 100-587): 19        (1) The Director of Aging, or his or her designee, who 20    shall serve as the chairperson of the Subcommittee. 21        (2) One representative of the Department of Healthcare 22    and Family Services, appointed by the Director of 23    Healthcare and Family Services. 24        (3) One representative of the Department of Human 25    Services, appointed by the Secretary of Human Services. 26        (4) One individual representing a care coordination   HB4916- 19 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1    unit, appointed by the Director of Aging. 2        (5) One individual from a non-governmental statewide 3    organization that advocates for seniors, appointed by the 4    Director of Aging. 5        (6) One individual representing Area Agencies on 6    Aging, appointed by the Director of Aging. 7        (7) One individual from a statewide association 8    dedicated to Alzheimer's care, support, and research, 9    appointed by the Director of Aging. 10        (8) One individual from an organization that employs 11    persons who provide services under the Community Care 12    Program, appointed by the Director of Aging. 13        (9) One member of a trade or labor union representing 14    persons who provide services under the Community Care 15    Program, appointed by the Director of Aging. 16        (10) One member of the Senate, who shall serve as 17    co-chairperson, appointed by the President of the Senate. 18        (11) One member of the Senate, who shall serve as 19    co-chairperson, appointed by the Minority Leader of the 20    Senate. 21        (12) One member of the House of Representatives, who 22    shall serve as co-chairperson, appointed by the Speaker of 23    the House of Representatives. 24        (13) One member of the House of Representatives, who 25    shall serve as co-chairperson, appointed by the Minority 26    Leader of the House of Representatives.   HB4916- 20 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1        (14) One individual appointed by a labor organization 2    representing frontline employees at the Department of 3    Human Services. 4    The Subcommittee shall provide oversight to the Community 5Care Program Medicaid Initiative and shall meet quarterly. At 6each Subcommittee meeting the Department on Aging shall 7provide the following data sets to the Subcommittee: (A) the 8number of Illinois residents, categorized by planning and 9service area, who are receiving services under the Community 10Care Program and are enrolled in the State's Medical 11Assistance Program; (B) the number of Illinois residents, 12categorized by planning and service area, who are receiving 13services under the Community Care Program, but are not 14enrolled in the State's Medical Assistance Program; and (C) 15the number of Illinois residents, categorized by planning and 16service area, who are receiving services under the Community 17Care Program and are eligible for benefits under the State's 18Medical Assistance Program, but are not enrolled in the 19State's Medical Assistance Program. In addition to this data, 20the Department on Aging shall provide the Subcommittee with 21plans on how the Department on Aging will reduce the number of 22Illinois residents who are not enrolled in the State's Medical 23Assistance Program but who are eligible for medical assistance 24benefits. The Department on Aging shall enroll in the State's 25Medical Assistance Program those Illinois residents who 26receive services under the Community Care Program and are   HB4916- 21 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1eligible for medical assistance benefits but are not enrolled 2in the State's Medicaid Assistance Program. The data provided 3to the Subcommittee shall be made available to the public via 4the Department on Aging's website. 5    The Department on Aging, with the involvement of the 6Subcommittee, shall collaborate with the Department of Human 7Services and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 8on how best to achieve the responsibilities of the Community 9Care Program Medicaid Initiative. 10    The Department on Aging, the Department of Human Services, 11and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 12coordinate and implement a streamlined process for seniors to 13access benefits under the State's Medical Assistance Program. 14    The Subcommittee shall collaborate with the Department of 15Human Services on the adoption of a uniform application 16submission process. The Department of Human Services and any 17other State agency involved with processing the medical 18assistance application of any person enrolled in the Community 19Care Program shall include the appropriate care coordination 20unit in all communications related to the determination or 21status of the application. 22    The Community Care Program Medicaid Initiative shall 23provide targeted funding to care coordination units to help 24seniors complete their applications for medical assistance 25benefits. On and after July 1, 2019, care coordination units 26shall receive no less than $200 per completed application,   HB4916- 22 -LRB104 17866 KTG 31302 b1which rate may be included in a bundled rate for initial intake 2services when Medicaid application assistance is provided in 3conjunction with the initial intake process for new program 4participants.5    The Community Care Program Medicaid Initiative shall cease 6operation 5 years after June 4, 2018 (the effective date of 7Public Act 100-587), after which the Subcommittee shall 8dissolve. 9    Effective July 1, 2023, subject to federal approval, the 10Department on Aging shall reimburse Care Coordination Units at 11the following rates for case management services: $252.40 for 12each initial assessment; $366.40 for each initial assessment 13with translation; $229.68 for each redetermination assessment; 14$313.68 for each redetermination assessment with translation; 15$200.00 for each completed application for medical assistance 16benefits; $132.26 for each face-to-face, choices-for-care 17screening; $168.26 for each face-to-face, choices-for-care 18screening with translation; $124.56 for each 6-month, 19face-to-face visit; $132.00 for each MCO participant 20eligibility determination; and $157.00 for each MCO 21participant eligibility determination with translation. 22(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-102, Article 45, Section 2345-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, Article 85, Section 85-5, eff. 241-1-24; 103-102, Article 90, Section 90-5, eff. 1-1-24; 25103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-670, eff. 261-1-25; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)